Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8432.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-5-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-5 entitled "Assaults" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
11-5-5. Assault of police officers and other officials.
Any person who shall make an assault or battery, or both, by knowingly and willfully either
(1) striking, or (2) spraying with a noxious chemical, commonly used as a personal defense weapon,
including Mace and an oleoresin capsicum product or like products, a uniformed member of the
state police or metropolitan park police, environmental police officer, state properties patrol officer,
probation and parole officers, state government case worker or investigator, judge of the supreme,
superior, family, district court, traffic tribunal or municipal court, deputy sheriff, city or town police
officer or firefighter, member of the capitol police, member of campus security force of state
colleges and universities, member of the Rhode Island airport police department, member of the
Rhode Island fugitive task force, Rhode Island public transit authority bus driver, or on-duty
plainclothes member of the town, city, or state police force, investigator of the department of the
attorney general appointed pursuant to § 42-9-8.1, or member of the railroad police after proper
identification is displayed, or any railroad worker, or uniformed dog officer, or out-of-state police
officer called into Rhode Island under a cooperative agreement to provide mutual aid at the request
of the state of Rhode Island pursuant to chapter 37 of title 42, or assistant attorney general or special
assistant attorney general, or employees of the department of environmental management
responsible for administrative inspections or any constable authorized by chapter 45-16 of the

Rhode Island general law causing bodily injury while the officer or official is engaged in the
performance of his or her duty, shall be deemed to have committed a felony, and shall be
imprisoned not exceeding three (3) years, or fined not exceeding fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500),
or both.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006309
========
LC006309 - Page 2 of 3